Utah statutes.
16-10a-641.   Unclaimed distributions.

If a corporation has mailed three successive distributions to a shareholder addressed to the shareholder's address shown on the corporation's current record of shareholders and the distributions have been returned as undeliverable, no further attempt to deliver distributions to the shareholder need be made until another address for the shareholder is made known to the corporation, at which time all distributions accumulated by reason of this section shall, except as otherwise provided by law, be mailed to the shareholder at the other address.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

